Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-1625
Care quality and patient satisfaction measurements.

A participating provider shall continuously monitor care quality in accordance with a standardized set of care quality and patient satisfaction measurements. Such care quality measurements shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Patient engagement measurement, including, but not limited to, the percentage of enrollees who have:

(a) Completed a health risk assessment; and

(b) Completed a face-to-face visit to the enrollee's participating provider;

(2) Prevention measurement, including, but not limited to, the percentage of enrollees who have received appropriate screenings for their age or gender; and

(3) Chronic disease management.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 8.
July 19, 2018